extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX X Y 167
SFX X   liat        lajem      kliat is:1st_person
SFX X   liat        lajes      kliat is:2nd_person
SFX X   liat        laje       kliat is:3rd_person
SFX X   liat        lajeme     kliat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX X   liat        lajete     kliat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX X   liat        laju       kliat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   liat        laj        kliat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   liat        lajme      kliat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   liat        lajte      kliat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   liat        lajuc      kliat is:participle
SFX X   iat         ejem       [^k]liat is:1st_person
SFX X   iat         ejes       [^k]liat is:2nd_person
SFX X   iat         eje        [^k]liat is:3rd_person
SFX X   iat         ejeme      [^k]liat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX X   iat         ejete      [^k]liat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX X   iat         eju        [^k]liat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   iat         ej         [^k]liat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   iat         ejme       [^k]liat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iat         ejte       [^k]liat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iat         ejuc       [^k]liat is:participle
SFX X   iat         ajem       riat is:1st_person
SFX X   iat         ajes       riat is:2nd_person
SFX X   iat         aje        riat is:3rd_person
SFX X   iat         ajeme      riat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX X   iat         ajete      riat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX X   iat         aju        riat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   iat         aj         riat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   iat         ajme       riat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iat         ajte       riat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iat         ajuc       riat is:participle
SFX X   iat         ejem       [dsvm]iat is:1st_person
SFX X   iat         ejes       [dsvm]iat is:2nd_person
SFX X   iat         eje        [dsvm]iat is:3rd_person
SFX X   iat         ejeme      [dsvm]iat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX X   iat         ejete      [dsvm]iat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX X   iat         eju        [dsvm]iat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   iat         ej         [dsvm]iat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   iat         ejme       [dsvm]iat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iat         ejte       [dsvm]iat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iat         ejuc       [dsvm]iat is:participle
SFX X   ziat        ezmem      ziat is:1st_person
SFX X   ziat        ezmes      ziat is:2nd_person
SFX X   ziat        ezme       ziat is:3rd_person
SFX X   ziat        ezmeme     ziat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX X   ziat        ezmete     ziat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX X   ziat        ezmu       ziat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   ziat        ezmi       ziat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   ziat        ezmime     ziat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   ziat        ezmite     ziat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   ziat        ezmuc      ziat is:participle
SFX X   iat         al         ziat is:1st_person is:past
SFX X   iat         al         ziat is:3rd_person is:past
SFX X   iat         ala        ziat is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX X   iat         alo        ziat is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX X   iat         ali        ziat is:3rd_person is:past
SFX X   at          al         [^z]iat is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX X   at          ala        [^z]iat is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX X   at          alo        [^z]iat is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX X   at          ali        [^z]iat is:1st_person
SFX X   at          ali        [^z]iat is:3rd_person
SFX X   at          am         [^i]at is:1st_person
SFX X   at          as         [^i]at is:2nd_person
SFX X   at          a          [^i]at is:3rd_person
SFX X   at          ame        [^i]at is:1st_person is:plural
SFX X   at          ate        [^i]at is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX X   at          aju        [^i]at is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   at          aj         [^i]at is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   at          ajme       [^i]at is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   at          ajte       [^i]at is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   at          ajuc       [^i]at is:participle
SFX X   at          al         [^i]at is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX X   at          ala        [^i]at is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX X   at          alo        [^i]at is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX X   at          ali        [^i]at is:2nd_person is:plural is:past
SFX X   at          ali        [^i]at is:1st_person is:plural is:past
SFX X   iet         em         ciet is:1st_person
SFX X   iet         es         ciet is:2nd_person
SFX X   iet         e          ciet is:3rd_person
SFX X   iet         eme        ciet is:1st_person is:plural
SFX X   iet         ete        ciet is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX X   ciet        tiac       ciet is:participle
SFX X   iet         i          [clr]iet is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   iet         ime        [clr]iet is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iet         ite        [clr]iet is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iet         u          [cr]iet is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   iet         iac        riet is:participle
SFX X   iet         eju        [^clr]iet is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   iet         ej         [^clr]iet is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   iet         ejme       [^clr]iet is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iet         ejte       [^clr]iet is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   iet         ejuc       [^clr]iet is:participle
SFX X   t           m          iet is:1st_person
SFX X   t           s          iet is:2nd_person
SFX X   et          e          iet is:3rd_person
SFX X   t           me         iet is:1st_person is:plural
SFX X   t           te         iet is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX X   iet         el         iet is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX X   iet         ela        iet is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX X   iet         elo        iet is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX X   iet         eli        iet is:1st_person is:plural is:past
SFX X   iet         eli        iet is:2nd_person is:plural is:past
SFX X   iet         eli        iet is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX X   bit         b          bit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   cit         c          cit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   cit         c          cit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   dit         d          dit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   dit         dme        dit is:1st_person is:imperative
SFX X   dit         dte        dit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   fit         f          fit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   git         g          git is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   chit        ch         chit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   it          a          jit is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   it          ac         jit is:participle
SFX X   jit         j          jit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   it          ia         [^j]it is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX X   it          iac        [^j]it is:participle
SFX X   kit         k          kit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   lit         l          [aaaeeiioouuyy]lit is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX X   lit         lme        [aaaeeiioouuyy]lit is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   lit         lte        [aaaeeiioouuyy]lit is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   it          i          [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit is:3rd_person
SFX X   it          ime        [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit is:1st_person is:plural
SFX X   it          ite        [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX X   it          ime        [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   it          ite        [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX X   mit         m          mit is:2nd_person is:imperative
