extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
biedit/XN po:verb
bozkavat/XN po:verb
bujniet/XN po:verb
cervaviet/XN po:verb
chmatat/XTN po:verb
chulostiviet/XN po:verb
cicikat/XN po:verb
combalat/XN po:verb
deraviet/XN po:verb
dobyvat/XN po:verb
dodruzgat/XN po:verb
dohravat/XN po:verb
doliat/XN po:verb
doobjednavat/XN po:verb
doprevadzat/XN po:verb
dosalat/XN po:verb
dosusat/XN po:verb
dotykat/XN po:verb
dovrsit/XN po:verb
dreveniet/XN po:verb
durievat/XN po:verb
flieskat/XN po:verb
hadat/XN po:verb
hniezdievat/XN po:verb
hrdzaviet/XN po:verb
hvizdat/XN po:verb
karpaviet/XN po:verb
kliesnit/XN po:verb
kotulat/XN po:verb
krkat/XN po:verb
kvakat/XN po:verb
latat/XN po:verb
listuvat/XN po:verb
malatniet/XN po:verb
mierit/XN po:verb
motavat/XN po:verb
nabijat/XN po:verb
nacitavat/XN po:verb
nadiat/XN po:verb
nadrzat/XN po:verb
nahliadat/XN po:verb
nahybat/XN po:verb
nalamat/XN po:verb
namlatit/XN po:verb
napajat/XN po:verb
napuchat/XN po:verb
narubat/XN po:verb
nastiepat/XN po:verb
nasukat/XN po:verb
natrieskat/XN po:verb
navnadzat/XN po:verb
nazivat/XN po:verb
obalachat/XN po:verb
obhanat/XN po:verb
obkrucat/XN po:verb
obmienat/XN po:verb
obrezavat/XN po:verb
obstipkavat/XN po:verb
obuvat/XN po:verb
ochoriet/XN po:verb
odbudat/XN po:verb
odflinkavat/XN po:verb
odiat/XN po:verb
odkradat/XN po:verb
odlisit/XN po:verb
odokryvat/XN po:verb
odpalit/XN po:verb
odprasit/XN po:verb
odratat/XN po:verb
odskierat/XN po:verb
odstrkavat/XN po:verb
odumierat/XN po:verb
odvolavat/XN po:verb
ohlasit/XN po:verb
ohynat/XN po:verb
okrikat/XN po:verb
omaciavat/XN po:verb
omyvat/XN po:verb
opantavat/XN po:verb
oplesniviet/XN po:verb
opriet/XN po:verb
osiat/XN po:verb
oskriet/XN po:verb
ostarievat/XN po:verb
otazievat/XN po:verb
otrieskat/XN po:verb
ovoniavat/XN po:verb
pachat/XN po:verb
pestrit/XN  po:verb
platat/XN po:verb
pobeliet/XN po:verb
pochutnavat/XN po:verb
podhrabuvat/XN po:verb
podliehat/XN po:verb
podolievat/XN po:verb
podrazat/XN po:verb
podstielat/XN po:verb
podviazat/XN po:verb
pohasinat/XN po:verb
pojimat/XN po:verb
pokukavat/XN po:verb
poluvat/XN po:verb
ponadavat/XN po:verb
popchavat/XN po:verb
popretrhat/XN po:verb
porozbijat/XN po:verb
poschadzat/XN po:verb
pospinat/XN po:verb
postriekat/XN po:verb
potkynat/XN po:verb
poutierat/XN po:verb
povyhravat/XN po:verb
povystierat/XN po:verb
pozamrzat/XN po:verb
pozhovarat/XN po:verb
prasiviet/XN po:verb
prechvalit/XN po:verb
prediskutuvat/XN po:verb
prehladavat/XN po:verb
preklzavat/XN po:verb
premalovavat/XN po:verb
preobliekat/XN po:verb
prepoziciavat/XN po:verb
preskusat/XN po:verb
pretapat/XN po:verb
prevrhat/XN po:verb
pricitat/XN po:verb
prikovavat/XN po:verb
prinavratit/XN po:verb
pririekat/XN po:verb
privadzat/XN po:verb
racit/XN po:verb
rozbujniet/XN po:verb
rozgurazit/XN po:verb
rozkyvat/XN po:verb
roznasat/XN po:verb
rozoznavat/XN po:verb
rozprskuvat/XN po:verb
rozstierat/XN po:verb
roztrubit/XN po:verb
rozzierat/XN po:verb
schulit/XN po:verb
sikat/XN po:verb
skrepeniet/XN po:verb
sliepnat/XN po:verb
spamatuvat/XN po:verb
spolucitit/XN po:verb
sprostredkuvat/XN po:verb
stliet/XN po:verb
stroskotavat/XN po:verb
svarit/XN po:verb
trapit/XN po:verb
tuzit/XN po:verb
udrziavat/XN po:verb
ulutit/XN po:verb
uputat/XN po:verb
utierat/XN po:verb
uzmierit/XN po:verb
vkradat/XN po:verb
vravievat/XN po:verb
vtlkat/XN po:verb
vychvalit/XN po:verb
vyduvat/XN po:verb
vykantrit/XN po:verb
vykurit/XN po:verb
vymeskavat/XN po:verb
vyoravat/XN po:verb
vypomahat/XN po:verb
vyrozpravat/XN po:verb
vyskumat/XN po:verb
vysukat/XN po:verb
vytrusit/XN po:verb
vyziadat/XN po:verb
vzhliadat/XN po:verb
zabrdat/XN po:verb
zacriet/XN po:verb
zahlbat/XN po:verb
zajachtavat/XN po:verb
zakurit/XN po:verb
zamiesat/XN po:verb
zaondiat/XN po:verb
zapocuvat/XN po:verb
zaryt/XN po:verb
zastaravat/XN po:verb
zatmievat/XN po:verb
zavinat/XN po:verb
zbelasiet/XN po:verb
zdrevnatiet/XN po:verb
zhrckaviet/XN po:verb
zladoviet/XN po:verb
zmamit/XN po:verb
zmurit/XN po:verb
znovuziskat/XN po:verb
zosmutniet/XN po:verb
zovsedniet/XN po:verb
zruzoviet/XN po:verb
zvlacat/XN po:verb
